Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 3 Administrative Procedure

Provisions of Administrative Procedure Act do not apply to legislative actions or hearings.

McGann v. City Council of Laramie, 581 P.2d 1104,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 1978).

Such as decisions of zoning authority. —

When zoning or rezoning an area within its boundaries, a zoning authority, such as the city council, is acting within its legislative capacity, and its decisions thereon are not reviewable by the district court under this chapter. McGann v. City Council of Laramie, 581 P.2d 1104,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 1978).

The approval of a planned unit development plat is tantamount to amending zoning regulations and is, therefore, a legislative act that is not reviewable under this chapter. Sheridan Planning Ass'n v. Board of Sheridan County Comm'rs, 924 P.2d 988,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1996).

Contested case hearings. —

The department of family services rule that limits the issues in a contested hearing to a determination of whether the agency acted in accordance with the law or its own rules does not comply with this chapter because it prevents the department from conducting a full review of the factual issues at the contested hearing. JM v. Department of Family Servs., 922 P.2d 219,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1996).

Aid-to-Dependent-Children claimant not entitled to hearingto determine legislative facts. —

The requirement of due process of law that an opportunity be afforded to be heard on issues of adjudicative facts does not necessarily encompass any similar hearing on legislative facts. Where the only questions of fact which an Aid to Dependent Children claimant claims could be determined at the fair hearing are: (1) that the new assistance unit factors were not properly promulgated under the Administrative Procedure Act; and (2) that the need level, which ultimately determines the amount of the benefit for a given assistance unit, was not properly established, the “facts” which she would have resolved in a hearing are legislative facts. Walker v. Karpan, 726 P.2d 82,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 615

(Wyo. 1986).

Discharge of continuing contract teacher lawful if “good cause”shown in impartial hearing. —

A discharge of a continuing contract teacher is lawful only if substantial evidence shows the existence of “good cause,” and the teacher is given a hearing by an impartial board as required by this chapter. Simineo v. School Dist., 594 F.2d 1353, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 16044 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1979).

Applied

in

Sage Club, Inc. v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 601 P.2d 1306,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1979); Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980); Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982); Tremblay v. Reid, 700 P.2d 391,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 488

(Wyo. 1985); Nesius v. State Dep't of Revenue & Taxation, 791 P.2d 939,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1990); Griess v. Office of the AG, Div. of Crim. Investigation, 932 P.2d 734,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Irvine, 589 P.2d 1295,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 358

(Wyo. 1979); People v. Fremont Energy Corp., 651 P.2d 802,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 386

(Wyo. 1982); Wyoming State Eng'r v. Willadsen, 792 P.2d 1376,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1990); Robbins v. South Cheyenne Water & Sewage Dist., 792 P.2d 1380,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1990); Wagoner v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 924 P.2d 88,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

For case note, “Filing of Claims Against the State: Is ‘Almost’ Good Enough? Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1979).

For case note, “The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions, Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1979).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

For comment, “Solar Access Rights in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1984).

For case note, “Administrative Law — Broader Jurisdiction for the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission. Gulf Oil Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 693 P.2d 227,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 422

(Wyo. 1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 69 (1986).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

For case note, “Contract Law — Employee Handbooks: At-Will or Not At Will? A Question of Form Over Substance. McDonald v. Mobil Coal Producing, Inc., 820 P.2d 986,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1991),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 289 (1993).

For case note, “An Uncommonly Rare Decision—The Wyoming Supreme Court Orders Agency Rulemaking. In the Matter of Bessemer Mountain, Rissler & McMurray Co. v. Environmental Quality Council (In re Bessemer Mt.), 856 P.2d 450,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 615 (1994).

For article, “A Guide to Air Quality Operating Permits in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 713 (1996).

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d Administrative Law § 1 et seq.

Administrative decision by officer not present when evidence was taken, 18 ALR2d 606.

Power of administrative agency, in investigation of nonjudicial nature, to issue subpoenas against persons not subject to the agency's regulatory jurisdiction, 27 ALR2d 1208.

Libel and slander privilege applicable to judicial proceedings as extending to administrative proceedings, 45 ALR2d 1296.

Exclusion or inclusion of terminal Sunday or holiday in computing time for taking or perfecting administrative appeal or review, 61 ALR2d 482.

Weight of evidence of surveys or polls of public or consumer opinion, recognition, preference or the like, 76 ALR2d 619.

Stare decisis doctrine as applicable to decisions of administrative agencies, 79 ALR2d 1126.

Effect of court review of administrative decision, 79 ALR2d 1126.

Right to assistance of counsel in administrative proceedings, 33 ALR3d 229.

Hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Effectiveness of employer's disclaimer of representations in personnel manual or employee handbook altering at-will employment relationship, 17 ALR5th 1.

Validity, construction and application of statutes making public proceedings open to the public, 38 ALR3d 1070, 34 ALR5th 591.

Applicability of Administrative Procedure Act (5 USC § 551 et seq.) to federal prison disciplinary proceedings, 39 ALR Fed 808.

Compliance with provision of Administrative Procedure Act, 5 USC § 553(d), providing that, with certain exceptions, required publication of a substantive rule must be made at least 30 days before its effective date, 54 ALR Fed 553.

Exhaustion of administrative remedies as prerequisite to judicial action to compel disclosure under Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) (5 U.S.C. § 552), 112 ALR Fed 561.

73 C.J.S. Public Administrative Law and Procedure §§ 71 to 73.

§ 16-3-101.
Short title; definitions.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act”.

As used in this act:

“Agency” means any authority, bureau, board, commission, department, division, officer or employee of the state, a county, city or town or other political subdivision of the state, except the governing body of a city or town, the state legislature, the University of Wyoming, the judiciary, the consensus revenue estimating group as defined in W.S.

9-2-1002

and the investment funds committee created by W.S.

9-4-720

;

“Contested case” means a proceeding including but not restricted to ratemaking, price fixing and licensing, in which legal rights, duties or privileges of a party are required by law to be determined by an agency after an opportunity for hearing but excludes designations under W.S. 9-2-3207(h)(i);

“License” includes the whole or part of any agency permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter or similar form of permission required by law, but it does not include a license required solely for revenue purposes;

“Licensing” includes the agency process respecting the grant, denial, renewal, revocation, suspension, annulment, withdrawal or amendment of a license;

“Local agency” means any agency with responsibilities limited to less than statewide jurisdiction, except the governing body of a city or town;

“Party” means each person or agency named or admitted as a party or properly seeking and entitled as of right to be admitted as a party;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, municipality, governmental subdivision or public or private organization of any character other than an agency;

“Registrar of rules” for state agency rules means the secretary of state. “Registrar of rules” for local agency rules means the county clerk of the county in which the rule is to be effective;

“Rule” means each agency statement of general applicability that implements, interprets and prescribes law, policy or ordinances of cities and towns, or describes the organization, procedures, or practice requirements of any agency. The term includes the amendment or repeal of a prior rule, but does not include:

Statements concerning only the internal management of an agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the public; or

Rulings issued pursuant to W.S.

16-3-106

; or

Intraagency memoranda; or

Agency decisions and findings in contested cases; or

Rules concerning the use of public roads or facilities which are indicated to the public by means of signs and signals; or

Ordinances of cities and towns; or

Designations under W.S. 9-2-3207(h)(i); or

A general permit.

“State agency” means any agency with statewide responsibilities;

“General permit” means a permit issued by the department of environmental quality which authorizes a category or categories of discharges or emissions;

“Internet” means as defined in W.S. 9-2-3219(a)(iii);

“This act” means W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.19; Laws 1977, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 154, § 1; 1982, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1993, ch. 80, § 1; 1997, ch. 83, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2012, ch. 109, § 1; 2014 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to exemption of promulgation of substantive rules and conduct of hearings of state board of parole from this chapter, except for filing of rules and regulations, see § 7-13-402(d).

As to a hearing to contest the issuance of a cease and desist order to a Wyoming financial institution or bank holding company, see §

13-10-208

.

As to the authority of the department of transportation to adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, see §

37-9-310

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(ix)(E) and (F), added “or” at the end of each.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2012 amendment,

in (b), added (b)(ix)(H) and made stylistic changes, added (b)(xi), and redesignated former (b)(xi) as (b)(xii).

Laws 2012, ch. 109, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2012.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added present (b)(xii); and redesignated former (b)(xii) as (b)(xiii).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “and the consensus revenue estimating group as defined in W.S.

9-2-1002

” for “and the judiciary” at the end of (b)(i).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i) added “and the investment funds committee created by
W.S.

9-4-720

” at the end of the introductory language, made a related change, and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "9-2-3207(h)(i)" for "9-2-1022(h)(i)" in (b)(ii) and (b)(ix)(G); and substituted "9-2-3219(a)(iii)" for "9-2-1035(a)(iii)" in (b)(xii).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's Notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides: “To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

I. General Consideration.

II. Contested Cases.

III. Other Definitions.

§ 16-3-102.
General rulemaking requirements; assistance and authority of attorney general.

In addition to other rulemaking requirements imposed by law, each agency shall:

Adopt rules of practice setting forth the nature and requirements of all formal and informal procedures available in connection with contested cases;

Make available for public inspection all rules and all other written statements of policy or interpretations formulated, adopted or used by the agency in the discharge of its functions;

Make available for public inspection all final orders, decisions and opinions.

No agency rule, order or decision is valid or effective against any person or party, nor may it be invoked by the agency for any purpose, until it has been filed with the registrar of rules and made available for public inspection as required by this act. This subsection does not apply to orders or decisions in favor of any person or party with actual knowledge of the rule, order or decision.

In formulating rules of practice as required by this section, each agency may request the assistance of the attorney general and upon request the attorney general shall assist the agency or agencies in the preparation of rules of practice.

The office of administrative hearings shall adopt uniform rules for the use of state agencies setting forth the nature and requirements of all formal and informal procedures available in connection with contested cases.

The attorney general may repeal administrative rules of a state agency in accordance with this act if the rules have become obsolete and no other existing agency has authority to repeal the rules.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 108, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.20; Laws 1977, ch. 190, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-4-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 16, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 2014 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added (d) and (e).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1997, ch. 31, § 5, provides: “The legislative service office shall annually provide each member of the legislature with a list of the reports submitted to the legislature by state agencies identifying which committees of the legislature received each report.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 16-3-101(b)(xi).

Wyoming tax commission is required to adopt rules of practice

for the conduct of contested cases before it and the absence of such may be prejudicially fatal. Yeik v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 595 P.2d 965,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 427

(Wyo. 1979).

Properly promulgated rules have force and effect of law. —

Rules and regulations adopted pursuant to statutory authority and properly promulgated have the force and effect of law. Distad v. Cubin, 633 P.2d 167,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 370

(Wyo. 1981).

Internal Hearing Unit properly formed. —

The Division of Workers Safety and Compensation was authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relating to the resolution of contested matters that are not required to be heard by the Medical Commission or the Office of Administrative Hearings, including agency review of claimed late filings, and had ample authority to form the Internal Hearing Unit. Internal Hearing Unit. Sheneman v. Division of Workers' Safety & Comp. Internal Hearing Unit, 956 P.2d 344,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1998).

And prejudice may result from failure to adopt and file rules. —

A school board which terminates the employment of a continuing contract teacher may fail to show that the teacher is not prejudiced by the school district's failure to adopt rules of practice and file them as required by this section and §

16-3-104

.Monahan v. Board of Trustees, 486 P.2d 235,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1971).

Civil rule superseded by regulations. —

The applicable statutes and regulations relating to actions against the department of employment supersede Rule 6(d), W.R.C.P. (additional time after service by mail). Fullmer v. Wyoming Employment Sec. Comm'n, 858 P.2d 1122,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 1993).

County department of public assistance not bound by interpretative guideline in state manual. —

A county department of public assistance is not bound by an interpretative rule or guideline in the state social services manual, since such a guideline is not the equivalent of a duly promulgated rule or regulation having the force of law, and the failure of the department to follow the manual's review procedures does not deprive a party of his constitutional rights to due process and equal protection. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Breathalyzer test results not invalidated because of absence of rules governing chemical testing. —

Where the department of health and social services, under § 31-6-105(a), approved the method of testing for chemical sobriety, its failure to promulgate rules governing chemical testing results pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act did not invalidate the breathalyzer test results of the defendant, arrested for driving under the influence. Wheeler v. State, 705 P.2d 861,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 557

(Wyo. 1985).

Change in tax valuation method not “rule.” —

Letters issued by the department of revenue and taxation to announce a change in the valuation method for calculating the severance tax on uranium ore did not constitute “rules” and therefore did not require adoption pursuant to this chapter. Pathfinder Mines Corp. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 766 P.2d 531,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1988).

Authority For Internal Hearing Unit. —

This section and §

16-3-112

, along with §

27-14-802

vested the Division of Workers' Safety and Compensation with authority to form the Internal Hearing Unit comprised of members of the agency. Poll v. State ex rel. Department of Empl., Div. of Workers' Safety & Compensation, 963 P.2d 977,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Yeik v. Department of Revenue & Taxation, 595 P.2d 965,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 427

(Wyo. 1979); First Nat'l Bank v. Bonham, 559 P.2d 42,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 1977); Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982); Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Glenn v. Board of County Comm'rs, 440 P.2d 1,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1968); Rosenberger v. City of Casper Bd. of Adjustment, 765 P.2d 367,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

For article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Compliance with provision of Administrative Procedure Act, 5 USC § 553(d), providing that, with certain exceptions, required publication of a substantive rule must be made at least 30 days before its effective date, 54 ALR Fed 553.

What rules, statements and interpretations adopted by federal agencies must be published, 77 ALR Fed 572.